tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX BR Y 8
SFX BR 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BR 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX BR 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BR 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX BR 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BR 0 i .	+NVjd 
SFX BR 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BR 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX BS Y 8
SFX BS 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BS 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BS 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BS 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BS k ci .	+NVmn 
SFX BS 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX BS k cima .	+DLImn 
SFX BS ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX BT Y 10
SFX BT 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BT ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX BT ak ku .	+DLVjd 
SFX BT ak če .	+Vjd 
SFX BT ak kom .	+Ljd 
SFX BT ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX BT tak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX BT 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX BT ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX BT ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX BU Y 8
SFX BU 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BU 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BU 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX BU 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX BU 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX BU 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX BU 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX BU 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX BV Y 8
SFX BV 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BV 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX BV 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BV c če .	+Vjd 
SFX BV 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BV 0 i .	+NGVmn 
SFX BV 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX BV 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX BW Y 5
SFX BW 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BW 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX BW 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BW c če .	+Vjd 
SFX BW 0 om .	+Ijd 

SFX BX Y 9
SFX BX 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BX ak ka .	+GAjd 
SFX BX ak ku .	+DLjd 
SFX BX ak če .	+Vjd 
SFX BX ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX BX ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX BX 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX BX ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX BX ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX BY Y 8
SFX BY 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX BY ak ga .	+Gjd 
SFX BY ak gu .	+DLVjd 
SFX BY ak gom .	+Ijd 
SFX BY ak govi .	+NVmn 
SFX BY ak gova .	+Gmn 
SFX BY ak govima .	+DLImn 
SFX BY ak gove .	+Amn 

SFX BZ Y 7
SFX BZ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX BZ 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX BZ 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX BZ 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX BZ 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX BZ 0 i .	+NGVmn 
SFX BZ 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX CA Y 7
SFX CA 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CA 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX CA ak ku .	+DLVjd 
SFX CA ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX CA ak ci .	+NVjd 
SFX CA ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX CA ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX CB Y 7
SFX CB 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CB 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX CB 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CB 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX CB 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CB 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX CB 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX CC Y 9
SFX CC 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CC at ta .	+Gjd 
SFX CC at tu .	+DLjd 
SFX CC at te .	+Vjd 
SFX CC at tom .	+Ijd 
SFX CC at ti .	+NGVmn 
SFX CC at tiju .	+Gmn 
SFX CC at tima .	+DLImn 
SFX CC at te .	+Amn 

SFX CD Y 4
SFX CD 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CD 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX CD 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CD 0 em .	+Ijd 

SFX CE Y 8
SFX CE 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CE 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX CE 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CE ac če .	+Vjd 
SFX CE ac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX CE ac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX CE ac cima .	+DLImn 
SFX CE ac ce .	+Amn 

SFX CF Y 8
SFX CF 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CF anj nja .	+Gjd 
SFX CF anj nju .	+DLVjd 
SFX CF anj njem .	+Ijd 
SFX CF anj nji .	+NVmn 
SFX CF 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX CF anj njima .	+DLImn 
SFX CF anj nje .	+Amn 

SFX CG Y 8
SFX CG 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CG 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX CG 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CG h še .	+Vjd 
SFX CG 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CG h si .	+NVmn 
SFX CG h sima .	+DLImn 
SFX CG 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX CH Y 9
SFX CH 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CH ao la .	+GAjd 
SFX CH ao lu .	+DLjd 
SFX CH ao le .	+Vjd 
SFX CH ao lom .	+Ijd 
SFX CH ao lovi .	+NVmn 
SFX CH ao ova .	+Gmn 
SFX CH ao lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX CH ao love .	+Amn 

SFX CI Y 9
SFX CI 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CI tac ca .	+GAjd 
SFX CI tac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX CI tac če .	+Vjd 
SFX CI tac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX CI tac čevi .	+NVmn 
SFX CI tac čeva .	+Gmn 
SFX CI tac čevima .	+DLImn 
SFX CI tac čeve .	+Amn 

SFX CJ Y 8
SFX CJ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CJ an na .	+GAjd 
SFX CJ an nu .	+DLjd 
SFX CJ an nom .	+Ijd 
SFX CJ an novi .	+NVmn 
SFX CJ an nova .	+Gmn 
SFX CJ an novima .	+DLImn 
SFX CJ an nove .	+Amn 

SFX CK Y 9
SFX CK 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CK ac ca .	+Gjd 
SFX CK ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX CK ac če .	+Vjd 
SFX CK ac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX CK ac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX CK 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX CK ac cima .	+DLImn 
SFX CK ac ce .	+Amn 

SFX CL Y 4
SFX CL 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CL 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX CL 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CL 0 em .	+Ijd 

SFX CM Y 4
SFX CM 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CM ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX CM ak ku .	+DLVjd 
SFX CM ak če .	+Vjd 

SFX CN Y 7
SFX CN 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CN 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX CN 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CN 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CN 0 i .	+NVjd 
SFX CN 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX CN 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX CO Y 5
SFX CO 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CO ac ca .	+Gjd 
SFX CO ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX CO ac če .	+Vjd 
SFX CO ac cem .	+Ijd 

SFX CP Y 9
SFX CP 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CP am ma .	+Gjd 
SFX CP am mu .	+DLjd 
SFX CP am me .	+Vjd 
SFX CP am mom .	+Ijd 
SFX CP am movi .	+NVmn 
SFX CP am mova .	+Gmn 
SFX CP am movima .	+DLImn 
SFX CP am move .	+Amn 

SFX CQ Y 8
SFX CQ 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CQ 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX CQ 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX CQ 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CQ 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX CQ 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX CQ 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX CQ 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX CR Y 9
SFX CR 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CR dak tka .	+GAjd 
SFX CR dak tku .	+DLVjd 
SFX CR dak če .	+Vjd 
SFX CR dak tkom .	+Ijd 
SFX CR dak tci .	+NVmn 
SFX CR 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX CR dak tcima .	+DLImn 
SFX CR dak tke .	+Amn 

SFX CS Y 8
SFX CS 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CS 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX CS 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX CS g že .	+Vjd 
SFX CS 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CS g zi .	+NVmn 
SFX CS g zima .	+DLImn 
SFX CS 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX CT Y 7
SFX CT 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CT 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX CT 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CT 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX CT 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CT 0 i .	+NVjd 
SFX CT 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX CU Y 9
SFX CU 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CU 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX CU 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CU 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX CU 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CU n 0 .	+NVjd 
SFX CU in a .	+Gmn 
SFX CU in ima .	+DLImn 
SFX CU in e .	+Amn 

SFX CV Y 10
SFX CV 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CV 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX CV 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CV 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX CV 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX CV 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX CV 0 i .	+Nmn 
SFX CV 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX CV 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX CV 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX CW Y 9
SFX CW 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CW 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX CW 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CW k če .	+Vjd 
SFX CW 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CW 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX CW 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX CW 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX CW 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX CX Y 7
SFX CX 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CX 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX CX 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CX 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX CX 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CX 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX CX 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX CY Y 7
SFX CY 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX CY 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX CY 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX CY 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX CY 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CY 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX CY 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX CZ Y 8
SFX CZ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX CZ 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX CZ 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX CZ k če .	+Vjd 
SFX CZ 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX CZ k ci .	+NVmn 
SFX CZ k cima .	+DLImn 
SFX CZ 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX DA Y 8
SFX DA 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DA 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX DA 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX DA 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DA 0 evi .	+NVmn 
SFX DA 0 eva .	+Gmn 
SFX DA 0 evima .	+DLImn 
SFX DA 0 eve .	+Amn 

SFX DB Y 5
SFX DB 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DB ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX DB ak ku .	+DLVjd 
SFX DB ak če .	+Vjd 
SFX DB ak kom .	+Ijd 

SFX DC Y 7
SFX DC 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DC 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX DC 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX DC 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DC 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX DC 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX DC 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX DD Y 9
SFX DD 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DD 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX DD 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX DD c če .	+Vjd 
SFX DD 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX DD c čevi .	+NVmn 
SFX DD c čeva .	+Gmn 
SFX DD c čevima .	+DLImn 
SFX DD c čeve .	+Amn 

SFX DE Y 9
SFX DE 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DE dac ca .	+GAjd 
SFX DE dac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX DE dac če .	+Vjd 
SFX DE dac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX DE dac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX DE 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DE dac cima .	+DLImn 
SFX DE dac ce .	+Amn 

SFX DF Y 4
SFX DF 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DF ac ca .	+GAjd 
SFX DF ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX DF ac cem .	+Ijd 

SFX DG Y 9
SFX DG 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DG ar ra .	+GAjd 
SFX DG ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DG ar re .	+Vjd 
SFX DG ar rom .	+Ijd 
SFX DG ar ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX DG ar ova .	+Gmn 
SFX DG ar ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX DG ar ove .	+Amn 

SFX DH Y 9
SFX DH 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DH ao la .	+Gjd 
SFX DH ao lu .	+DLjd 
SFX DH ao le .	+Vjd 
SFX DH ao lom .	+Ijd 
SFX DH ao lovi .	+NAmn 
SFX DH ao lova .	+Gmn 
SFX DH ao lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX DH ao love .	+Amn 

SFX DI Y 7
SFX DI 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DI 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX DI 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX DI 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX DI 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DI 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX DI 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX DJ Y 8
SFX DJ 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DJ ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX DJ ak ku .	+DLjd 
SFX DJ ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX DJ ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX DJ 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DJ ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX DJ ak ke .	+Amn 
