tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.dic
areal/CX
bezbožnik/CZ
bezumnik/CZ
lovor/BR
mačak/BS
metak/BT
miš/BU
mjesec/BV
Mjesec/BW
mnogokut/CX
momak/BX
mozak/BY
mrav/BZ
mućak/CA
narod/CB
nokat/CC
nosač/CD
novac/CE
oganj/CF
orah/CG
orao/CH
otac/CI
ovan/CJ
palac/CK
Pariz/CL
patak/CM
pionir/CN
pisac/CO
pojam/CP
pojas/CQ
predak/CR
predjel/CX
prijdlog/CS
princ/DD
profesor/CT
pučanin/CU
put/CV
rak/CW
ribež/CX
sabor/CY
savjet/CX
seljak/CZ
sir/DA
Sisak/DB
sokol/DC
stric/DD
sudac/DE
svemir/CY
svetac/DF
svežanj/CF
tigar/DG
traktor/CX
ugao/DH
uzor/DI
valjak/DJ
zdenac/CK
